Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.005

Deputy directors.

The director of labor and industries may appoint and deputize two assistant directors to be known as deputy directors. The director shall designate one deputy director who, in case a vacancy occurs in the office of director, shall continue in charge of the department until a director is appointed and qualified, or the governor appoints an acting director.

[ 1985 c 325 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 32 s 2.]